Mississippi, session 2026, HB304.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Board of Supervisors of Noxubee County, Mississippi, to assist in paying costs associated with the completion of the road improvement projects described in Section 2 of this act for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027 $4,000,000.00 SECTION 2.  The money appropriated by Section 1 of this act shall be used by the board of supervisors for the following road improvement projects, with One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) allocated for each project: Supervisors District 1:  Gillespie Road Supervisors District 3: Macon-Lynn Creek Road (East) Supervisors District 4: Dorroh Hill Road Supervisors District 5:  Macon-Lynn Creek Road (West) SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.